Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6279.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 67c. (1) The department shall ensure that a prisoner has timely access to necessary medical, dental, optical, and mental health care. (2) The director shall maintain policies that ensure all of the following: (a) Continuity of care for a prisoner, including, but not limited to, access to prescribed medications and necessary follow-up treatment. (b) The privacy of a prisoner receiving the care described in subsection (1), in a manner that is consistent with security needs and applicable law. (c) That medical examinations and treatment are conducted in a manner that preserves the dignity of a prisoner to the greatest extent practicable. (3) A prisoner who believes that this section is violated may file a grievance through the department's prisoner grievance system. (4) As used in this section, "timely access" means access within a time frame that is reasonably necessary to prevent the deterioration of health, to avoid unnecessary pain, or to address a condition, consistent with generally accepted correctional and medical standards. Sec. 67e. (1) The department shall ensure reasonable access to programs and services for prisoners with disabilities. (2) The department shall provide a prisoner with access to assistive equipment. (3) The department shall establish and maintain a policy that ensures that a prisoner's disability-related needs are identified, documented, and addressed in a timely and consistent manner. (4) A prisoner who believes that this section is violated may file a grievance through the department's prisoner grievance system. (5) As used in this section, "assistive equipment" means hearing aids, eyeglasses, wheelchairs, walkers, prosthetic devices, communication aids, and other equipment that is necessary to support the prisoner's mobility, communication, access to health care, access to programs and services, or needs of daily living within the correctional facility. Sec. 67f. (1) The department shall maintain environmental and physical conditions that do not pose a substantial risk to the health or safety of prisoners, including, but not limited to, sanitation, ventilation, temperature, and exposure to hazardous conditions. (2) The department shall, in a timely manner, address conditions that create a risk of illness, injury, or deterioration of the health of a prisoner, including, but not limited, lack of access to toilets, showers, hygiene facilities, and necessary sanitary products. (3) The department may conduct regular inspections or reviews to determine compliance with this section. (4) A prisoner who believes that this section is violated may file a grievance through the department's prisoner grievance system. (5) As used in this section, "timely manner" means within a time frame that is reasonably necessary and consistent with generally accepted correctional and medical standards.